Utah statutes.
58-40-5.   License requirements.
(1)  The division shall issue a license to practice as a master therapeutic
recreational specialist to any applicant who:
(a) (i)  has completed an approved graduate degree in therapeutic recreation
or a graduate degree with an approved emphasis in therapeutic recreation; and
(ii)  has completed 4,000 hours of paid experience, as defined by division
rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, as a licensed therapeutic recreational specialist or as a
certified therapeutic recreational specialist certified by the National
Council for Therapeutic Recreation Certification;
(b)  is of good moral character;
(c)  submits an application;
(d)  pays the required fee; and
(e)  passes an approved examination.
(2)  The division shall issue a license to practice as a therapeutic
recreational specialist to any applicant who:
(a)  has completed an approved bachelor's or graduate degree in therapeutic
recreation, a bachelor's or graduate degree with an approved emphasis in
therapeutic recreation, or a bachelor's or graduate degree with approved
additional course work in therapeutic recreation after graduation;
(b)  has completed an approved practicum;
(c)  is of good moral character;
(d)  submits an application;
(e)  pays the required fee; and
(f)  passes an approved examination.
(3)  The division shall issue a license to practice as a therapeutic
recreational technician to any applicant who:
(a)  has received a high school diploma or GED equivalent;
(b)  has completed:
(i)  an approved educational course in therapeutic recreation taught by a
licensed master therapeutic recreational specialist; or
(ii)  six semester hours or nine quarter hours in therapeutic recreation from
an accredited college or university;
(c)  has completed an approved practicum under the supervision of a licensed
master therapeutic recreational specialist or an on-site, full-time employed
therapeutic recreational specialist;
(d)  is of good moral character;
(e)  submits an application;
(f)  pays the required fee; and
(g)  passes an approved examination.
